District of Columbia statutes.
6-1032

Establishment of the Housing and Community Development Reform Advisory Commission; membership; chairperson.

(a)

There is established a Housing and Community Development Reform Advisory Commission (“Commission”).

(b)

The Commission shall consist of the following 7 members:

(1)

Three ex officio members, as follows:

(A)

The Chairman of the Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”), or a designee of the Chairman;

(B)

The chairperson of the Council’s Committee on Economic Development, or a designee of the chairperson; and

(C)

The Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development (“Director”), or a designee of the Director;

(2)

Four public members, appointed by the Mayor, subject to the advice and consent of the Council under § 1-523.01(f). The public members shall be nominated as follows:

(A)

Two members shall have expertise in government regulations related to grants managed by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development; provided, that the member shall not be a current or former officer, employee, agent, or other affiliate of an organization that has received funding from the Department of Housing and Community Development within the prior 5 years; and

(B)

One member shall have expertise in human resources and organizational management; provided, that the member shall not be a current or former officer, employee, agent, or other affiliate of an organization which has received funding from the Department of Housing and Community Development within the prior 5 years; and

(C)

One member shall have expertise in financial systems and information technology; provided, that the member shall not be a current or former officer, employee, agent, or other affiliate of an organization which has received funding from the Department of Housing and Community Development within the prior 5 years.

(c)

The Mayor shall nominate the public members of the Commission within 45 days after October 1, 2002.

(d)

The Chairperson of the Commission shall be designated by the Mayor in consultation with the chairperson of the Council Committee on Economic Development.

History

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1142, 49 DCR 6968

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Housing and Community Development Reform Advisory Commission Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-91, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3611).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Housing and Community Development Reform Advisory Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-223, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10700).